Massachusetts, session 194th, H398.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 93K of the General Laws, as most recently amended by Section 4 of
Chapter 386 of the Acts of 2022, is hereby amended by striking subsections (g) and (h) and
inserting in place thereof the following subsection (g):-
(g) The Attorney General is hereby directed to establish a motor vehicle telematics
system notice which a vehicle manufacturer shall include in the owner’s manual provided for its
new motor vehicles beginning with model year 2026 vehicles and which shall include the
following information: (i) an explanation of motor vehicle telematics and its purposes; (ii) a
description summarizing the mechanical data collected, stored, and transmitted by a telematics
system; (iii) the prospective owner’s ability to access the vehicle’s mechanical data through a
of 2

mobile device; and (iv) an owner’s right to authorize an independent repair facility to access the
vehicle’s mechanical data for vehicle diagnostics, repair, and maintenance purposes.
of 2